California statutes. Education Code
(e) Commencing with the 2000–01 academic year, and each academic year thereafter, the Cal Grant T award shall be used only for one academic year of full-time attendance in a program of professional preparation that has been approved by the
 California Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(f) An institution of higher education in this state that participates in the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program shall not reduce its level of per capita need-based institutional financial aid to undergraduate students, excluding loans, below the total level awarded in the 2000–01 academic year.

(g) The implementation of the policy set forth in this section shall maintain a balance between the state’s policy goals of ensuring student access to and selection of an institution of higher education for students with financial need and academic merit.

(h) It is the policy of the State of California that the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program supplement the federal Pell Grant program.

(i) An award under the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program shall not guarantee admission to an institution of higher education or admission to a specific campus or program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 13.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

66021.2.

Consistent with the state’s historic commitment to provide educational opportunity by ensuring both student access to and selection of an institution of higher education for students with financial need, the long-term policy of the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program established pursuant to Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42 shall be as follows:

(a) Commencing with the 2001–02 academic year and every year thereafter, an applicant for a Cal Grant A or B award shall receive an award that is not in excess of the financial need amount determined by the Student Aid Commission pursuant to Section 69432.9 if the applicant complies with all of the following requirements:

(1) Demonstrates
 financial need under the criteria adopted pursuant to Section 69432.9.

(2) Attains a grade point average, as defined in Section 69432.7, meeting the requirements of Chapter 1.7 (commencing with Section 69430) of Part 42.

(3) Complies with each of the eligibility criteria applicable to the type of Cal Grant award for which the applicant is applying.

(b) (1) (A) The maximum Cal Grant A award for a student attending the University of California or the California State University shall equal the mandatory systemwide fees in the segment attended by the student, plus the access award specified in Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42 if the student meets qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69465, or the access award specified
 in Article 10 (commencing with Section 69470) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42 if the student meets qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470.

(B) The maximum Cal Grant B award for a student who is attending the University of California, the California State University, or the California Community Colleges when not enrolled in upper division coursework as described in paragraph (2), shall equal the mandatory systemwide fees in the segment attended by the student, except for community college students who receive waivers from the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, plus the access award calculated as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435) or, if the student meets the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69465, Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42, or if the student meets qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470,
 Article 10 (commencing with Section 69470) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42, except that in the first year of enrollment in a qualifying institution, the maximum award shall be only for the amount of the access award.

(2) (A) The maximum Cal Grant A award for a community college student enrolled in upper division coursework of a baccalaureate degree program, described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7, shall equal the per unit fees charged for the upper division coursework for the academic term, plus the access award specified in Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42 if the student meets the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69465, or the access award specified in Article 10 (commencing with Section 69470) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42 if the student meets the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470.

(B) The maximum Cal Grant B award for a community college student enrolled in upper division coursework of a baccalaureate degree program, described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 78040) of Chapter 1 of Part 48 of Division 7, shall equal the per unit fees charged for the upper division coursework for the academic term, plus the access award calculated as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 69435) or, if the student meets the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69465, Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42, or if the student meets qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470, Article 10 (commencing with Section 69470) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42.

(c) The maximum Cal Grant awards for students attending nonpublic institutions shall be as follows:

(1) The maximum Cal Grant A award shall equal the tuition award level established in the Budget Act of 2000, or the amount as adjusted in subsequent annual budget acts.

(2) The maximum Cal Grant B award shall equal the amount of the tuition award as established in the Budget Act of 2000, or the amount as adjusted in subsequent annual budget acts, plus the amount of the access costs specified in Section 69435, except that, in the first year of enrollment in a qualifying institution, the maximum award shall be only for the amount of the access award.

(d) Commencing with the 2000–01 academic year, and each academic year thereafter, the Cal Grant C award shall be used only for occupational or technical training.

(e) Commencing with the 2000–01 academic year, and each academic year thereafter, the Cal Grant T
 award shall be used only for one academic year of full-time attendance in a program of professional preparation that has been approved by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(f) An institution of higher education in this state that participates in the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program shall not reduce its level of per capita need-based institutional financial aid to undergraduate students, excluding loans, below the total level awarded in the 2000–01 academic year.

(g) The implementation of the policy set forth in this section shall maintain a balance between the state’s policy goals of ensuring student access to and selection of an institution of higher education for students with financial need and academic merit.

(h) It is the policy of the State of California that the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program supplement the federal Pell Grant program.

(i) An award under the Ortiz-Pacheco-Poochigian-Vasconcellos Cal Grant Program shall not guarantee admission to an institution of higher education or admission to a specific campus or program.

(j) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2024, and, as of January 1, 2025, is repealed, only if General Fund moneys over the multiyear forecasts beginning in the 2024–25 fiscal year are available to support ongoing augmentations and actions, and if funding for the Cal Grant Reform Act, established pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 69405) of Part 42 of this division is
 included in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 7.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 65.   Conditionally inoperative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

66021.3.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 67400, by January 1, 2020, and permanently thereafter, each campus of the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges, and each independent institution of higher education as defined in Section 66010, shall provide students with the Financial Aid Shopping Sheet as developed by the United States Department of Education to inform students or individuals who have been offered admission about financial aid award packages. An institution subject to this section shall provide the completed Financial Aid Shopping Sheet when it provides in print or electronically a financial aid award package to an individual who is offered admission to the institution.

(b) In implementing this section, the
 institutions of higher education identified in this section may seek guidance as needed from the United States Department of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 78.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

66021.4.

It is the intent of the Legislature to support student financial aid programs for eligible students enrolled in teacher credential and graduate degree programs, including an emphasis on increasing the number of graduate students from currently and historically underrepresented groups who are preparing to become future elementary and secondary teachers or postsecondary faculty members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1699, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

66021.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, payments made, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11402.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to a student or applicant for enrollment shall not be considered when the California State University or a campus of the California Community Colleges determines eligibility for a waiver of fees, or any other financial aid, for a minor who is living in a dormitory or other designated housing of the institution he or she attends, as described in Section 11402.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 710, Sec. 1.   (AB 766)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

66021.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and except as provided for in subdivision (b), the Trustees of the California State University and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall, and the Regents of the University of California are requested to, establish procedures and forms that enable persons who are exempt from paying nonresident tuition under Section 68130.5, or who meet equivalent requirements adopted by the regents, to apply for, and participate in, all student aid programs administered by these segments to the full extent permitted by federal law. The Legislature finds and declares that this section is a state law within the meaning of Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(b) The number of financial aid awards received by California resident students from financial aid programs administered by the segments shall not be diminished as a result of the application of subdivision (a). The University of California is requested to comply with this subdivision.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2013.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 604, Sec. 1.   (AB 131)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Section operative January 1, 2013, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

66021.7.

Notwithstanding any other law, on and after January 1, 2012, a student attending the California State University, the California Community Colleges, or the University of California who is exempt from paying nonresident tuition under Section 68130.5 shall be eligible to receive a scholarship that is derived from nonstate funds received, for the purpose of scholarships, by the segment at which he or she is a student. The Legislature finds and declares that this section is a state law within the meaning of subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 93, Sec. 3.   (AB 130)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

66021.8.

(a) Commencing with the 2020–21 academic year, the California Community Colleges and the California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, designate a Dreamer Resource Liaison on each of their respective campuses, as specified in subdivision (b), to assist students meeting the requirements set forth in Section 68130.5 by streamlining access to all available financial aid and academic opportunities for those students.

(b) (1) Each campus of the California Community Colleges shall ensure that it has a staff person designated as a Dreamer Resource Liaison who is knowledgeable in available financial aid, social services, state-funded immigration legal services,
 internships, externships, and academic opportunities for all students meeting the requirements set forth in Section 68130.5, including undocumented students. The Legislature encourages each of these campuses to place this designated staff person in the campus’ extended opportunity programs and services office or financial aid office.

(2) Each campus of the California State University shall ensure that it has a staff person designated as a Dreamer Resource Liaison who is knowledgeable in available financial aid, social services, state-funded immigration legal services, internships, externships, and academic opportunities for all students meeting the requirements set forth in Section 68130.5, including undocumented students. The Legislature encourages each of these campuses to place this designated staff person in the campus’ educational opportunity programs office or financial aid office.

(3) The University of California is encouraged to designate a Dreamer Resource Liaison on each of its campuses. That staff person should be knowledgeable in available financial aid, social services, state-funded immigration legal services, internships, externships, and academic opportunities for all students meeting the requirements set forth in Section 68130.5, including undocumented students. The Legislature encourages each of these campuses to place this designated staff person in the campus’ educational opportunity programs office or financial aid office.

(c) (1) The California Community Colleges, the California State University, and the University of California are encouraged to establish Dream Resource Centers on each of their respective campuses.

(2) Dream Resource Centers may offer support services, including, but not necessarily limited to, state and institutional financial aid assistance, academic counseling, peer support services, psychological counseling, referral for social services, and state-funded immigration legal services. 

(d) (1) This section shall not be construed as encouraging the construction of a new or separate space for Dream Resource Centers.

(2) Dream Resource Centers may be housed within existing student service or academic centers.

(3) The space in which the Dreamer Resource Liaison is located may be deemed a Dream Resource Center. 

(e) Notwithstanding Section 11005 of the Government Code and any other law requiring approval by a state officer of gifts, bequests, devises, or donations, the Trustees of the California State University, the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, and the Regents of the University of California may seek and accept on behalf of the state any gift, bequest, devise, or donation whenever the gift and the terms and conditions thereof will aid in the creation and operation of Dream Resource Centers for their respective systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 788, Sec. 2.   (AB 1645)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

66021.9.

(a) The University of California may provide a scholarship as established by the university or a campus of the university, derived from nonstate funds received for that purpose, to any of its enrolled students who meet the eligibility requirements for that scholarship.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that this section is a state law within the meaning of subdivision (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until June 30, 2027,
 and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 50, Sec. 3.   (SB 117)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of June 30, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

66022.

(a) (1) The governing board of every community college district, the Trustees of the California State University, the Regents of the University of California, and the Board of Directors of the College of the Law, San Francisco shall adopt regulations providing for the withholding of institutional services from students or former students who have been notified in writing at the student’s or former student’s last known address that they are in default on a loan or loans under the Federal Family Education Loan Program.

(2) For purposes of this section, “default” means the failure of a borrower to make an installment payment when due, or to meet other terms of the promissory note under circumstances in which the guarantee agency finds it
 reasonable to conclude that the borrower no longer intends to honor the obligation to repay, provided that this failure persists for 180 days for a loan repayable in monthly installments, or 240 days for a loan repayable in less frequent installments.

(b) (1) The regulations adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall provide that the services withheld may be provided during a period when the facts are in dispute or when the student or former student demonstrates to either the governing board of the community college district, the Trustees of the California State University, the Regents of the University of California, or the Board of Directors of the College of the Law, San Francisco, as appropriate, or to the Student Aid Commission, or both the commission and the appropriate entity or its designee, that reasonable progress has been made to repay the loan or that a reasonable justification exists for the delay as determined
 by the institution. The regulations shall specify the services to be withheld from the student and may include, but are not limited to, either or both of the following:

(A) The provision of grades.

(B) The provision of diplomas.

(2) The adopted regulations shall not include the withholding of registration privileges or transcripts.

(c) This section shall not impose any requirement upon the University of California or the College of the Law, San Francisco unless the Regents of the University of California or the Board of Directors of the College of the Law, San Francisco, respectively, by resolution, make this section applicable.

(d) Guarantors, or those who act as their agents or act under
 their control, who provide information to postsecondary educational institutions pursuant to this section, shall defend, indemnify, and hold harmless the governing board of every community college district, the Trustees of the California State University, the Regents of the University of California, and the Board of Directors of the College of the Law, San Francisco from action resulting from compliance with this section when the action arises as a result of incorrect, misleading, or untimely information provided to the postsecondary educational institution by the guarantors, their agents, or those acting under the control of the guarantors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 188, Sec. 1.   (SB 886)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

66022.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Admission by exception” means the process by which a campus admits applicants who do not meet the eligibility requirements for admission to the segment, or guaranteed admission to a campus of the segment, but who demonstrate high potential for success and leadership in an academic or special talent program at the campus.

(2) “Campus” means a campus of the California State University or the University of California.

(3) “Senior campus administrator” shall not include any staff associated with campus development, external affairs, fundraising, donor relations, alumni relations, or alumni outreach.

(4) “Special talent program” refers to a campus’ program that requires additional admissions review to determine the qualification of an applicant for admission into that program. Special talent program includes, but is not necessarily limited to, a campus’ athletic or fine arts program.

(b) A campus shall not admit a student by admission by exception unless the student’s admission by exception has been approved, before the student’s enrollment, by a minimum of three senior
 campus administrators.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a campus may admit, by admission by exception, a California resident who is receiving an institution-based scholarship to attend the campus or an applicant who is accepted by an educational opportunity program for admission to the campus.

(d) A campus that admits a student by admission by exception shall comply with both of the following:

(1) Document its employees who were involved in the evaluation of the student’s application for admission.

(2) Establish a policy that applies articulated standards to the campus’ admissions by exception decisions. The standards shall include minimum procedural
 requirements and shall include an explanation for choosing the standards that supports their application as fair and appropriate.

(e) A campus that admits a student by admission by exception into an athletics program shall establish a policy requiring the student to participate in the program for a minimum of one academic year.

(f) (1) Upon request, a campus shall report to the Legislature, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, any information that is required to be established or documented pursuant to this section.

(2) The campus shall submit information to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (1) to the extent permitted by state and federal privacy laws, including, but not limited
 to, the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g).

(g) This section shall not be interpreted to prohibit the University of California from adopting policies that impose additional restrictions on or requirements for admission by exception.

(h) This section shall become operative commencing with admissions for the 2021–22 academic year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 47, Sec. 1.   (AB 251)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

66023.

Each segment of public higher education shall establish, and update as necessary, a written policy concerning students who are called to active military service. The policy shall do all of the following:

(a) Ensure that those students do not lose academic credits or degree status. 

(b) Provide for a refund of fees paid by the student for the term in which he or she was called to active military service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 30.5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

66023.4.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Basic needs services and resources” includes, but is not limited to, housing, food, clothing, feminine hygiene, diapers, technology, childcare services and resources, and mental health services and resources.

(2) “Childcare services and resources” includes, but is not limited to, providing information on affordable childcare options on and near campus and information and connections to local resource and referral agencies
 in order to obtain support in applying to state and federal childcare subsidies and programs and finding local childcare providers, including, but not limited to, the California state preschool program, Head Start, the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs) childcare program, and general child care and
 development programs. Childcare services and resources may also include direct financial or service support.

(3) “Coordinator” means a basic needs coordinator established pursuant to this section.

(b) Each campus of the California State University shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, do all of the following:

(1) On or before July 1, 2025, establish the position of the Basic Needs Coordinator, and designate a staff person as the Basic Needs Coordinator to serve as the single point of contact for students experiencing basic needs insecurity related to basic needs services and resources. The coordinator shall act as a broker in identifying, supporting, and linking students
 to on- and off-campus housing, food, mental health, and other basic needs services and resources. To ensure the effectiveness and impact of this position, the coordinator shall be a dedicated position solely focused on addressing the basic needs of students and meet qualifications such as experience providing services to high-need and diverse populations. The coordinator shall oversee and coordinate with other staff tasked with addressing students’ basic needs, shall inform students of on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources and how to access them, and shall develop on- and off-campus partnerships to provide basic needs services and resources to their students.

(2) (A) On or before July 1, 2025, establish a Basic Needs Center, which means a central location on campus where basic needs services,
 resources, and staff are made available to students. The Basic Needs Center is intended to be a one-stop, single location and point of contact for students to more easily access and gain awareness of basic needs services and resources. The campus shall make a reasonable effort to locate all on-campus basic needs services and resources at the Basic Needs Center. If the campus cannot reasonably locate all basic needs services or resources at the Basic Needs Center, the campus shall provide students with the location and contact information, including name, telephone number, and email address, for all basic needs services and resources not located in the Basic Needs Center. The coordinator shall be housed in the Basic Needs Center.

(B) Each Basic Needs Center shall do all of the following:

(i) Help ensure that students have the information they need to enroll in CalFresh, the California Earned Income Tax Credit (CalEITC), the Young Child Tax Credit (YCTC), the California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC), and other relevant government benefits programs. This clause does not require campus Basic Needs Centers to provide tax advising or preparation services.

(ii) If a campus has an existing center or office that supports parenting students and a student may be better served by that center or office, have the authority to direct that student to the
 student parent center or office.

(iii) Coordinate with their campus financial aid department or financial aid office. This clause does not require nor encourage the Basic Needs Center to be combined or colocated with the financial aid department or financial aid office.

(iv) Connect students to the financial aid department or financial aid office, as appropriate, to ensure that students are receiving all available financial aid, including supplemental awards such as the awards for students with dependent children established pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465) of Chapter 1.7 of Part 42.

(v) Coordinate with their local homelessness response system to refer students to community
 resources available to address homelessness in addition to services and resources provided by the campus.

(C) Basic Needs Centers may provide support to students who can be reasonably expected to enroll in the upcoming term and to provide support to students during summer and winter breaks who were previously enrolled or are enrolled for the upcoming fall or spring term.

(D) Campuses shall endeavor, to the extent feasible, to use a portion of any funds made available for basic needs support for providing funds directly to students to address urgent needs. To the extent that a Basic Needs Center is already in place, that center may be used to satisfy the requirements of this section. If the existing Basic Needs Center fulfills only part of the requirements of this section,
 basic needs services and resources shall be expanded as needed to satisfy all the requirements of this section.

(E) The childcare services and resources a Basic Needs Center may provide for parenting students includes, but is not limited to, direct financial or service support.

(3) (A) On or before February 1, 2025, develop a document that shall be provided to students at the Basic Needs Center, once established pursuant to paragraph (2), in either electronic format or paper form, and that shall be made available to students online, that clearly lists on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(i) The description of the service or
 resource.

(ii) The location of where the service or resource is provided.

(iii) The point of contact for the service or resource, including a name, telephone number, and email address.

(iv) Any eligibility restrictions on accessing the service or resource.

(v) The United States Department of Agriculture’s Food and Nutrition Service’s “SNAP Retail Locator” internet website link, which contains a map with locations that are authorized retail food stores under the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and accept the use of electronic benefits transfer cards issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10065) of Part 1 of Division 9 of
 the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(B) Provide the document to students as a part of campus orientations in either electronic format or paper form.

(C) Provide to faculty the online link to the electronic format of the document, the location of the Basic Needs Center, once established pursuant to paragraph (2), and the contact information for the coordinator, once designated pursuant to paragraph (1), and encourage faculty to include the online link to the electronic format of the document, the location of the Basic Needs Center, and the contact information for the coordinator in their syllabi.

(D) To ensure that the document remains useful to students, the document shall be reviewed, updated, and made available online on both
 the internet website of the campus via the student basic needs tab and the internet website-based student account associated with a student’s attendance at the institution, as specified in paragraph (6), no later than the first day of every fall semester or fall quarter.

(4) On or before February 1, 2025, streamline the application and intake process for on-campus basic needs services and resources to minimize duplication and eliminate barriers to access. If an application is required, develop and use a single application for students to receive on-campus basic needs services and resources.

(5) On or before February 1, 2025, develop and implement a plan to identify and provide outreach to students, including nontraditional students, who have basic needs insecurity related to
 housing, food, and mental health. Once the coordinator is designated pursuant to paragraph (1) and the Basic Needs Center is established pursuant to paragraph (2), the outreach shall include information about the coordinator and the Basic Needs Center.

(6) On or before February 1, 2025, provide a student basic needs tab that is clearly visible and easily accessible from a drop-down menu on the home page of the campus’ internet website and include the information described in paragraph (3) conspicuously on both the internet website of the campus via the student basic needs tab and the internet website-based student account associated with a student’s attendance at the institution. Once the coordinator is designated pursuant to paragraph (1) and the Basic Needs Center is established pursuant to paragraph (2), information about the coordinator
 and Basic Needs Center shall also be included on both the internet website of the campus via the student basic needs tab and the internet website-based student account associated with a student’s attendance at the institution.

(c) (1) Each campus of the California State University shall report to the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, and each campus of the University of California is requested to report to the office of the President of the University of California, information that shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(A) The description and number of basic needs services and resources, broken down by category.

(B) The number of students served by the basic
 needs services and resources.

(C) Any existing and available data regarding the socioeconomic and demographic backgrounds of these students.

(D) Challenges and best practices in the implementation of the basic needs services and resources.

(E) Whether students who used the basic needs services and resources remained enrolled or graduated from that campus.

(F) The number of students who first started receiving CalFresh benefits in the previous year and the total number of students in the previous year who received CalFresh benefits, as provided by the State Department of Social Services.

(G) Whether the campus has a data sharing agreement with the relevant county operating the CalFresh program for the purpose of identifying new, continuing, and returning students who are potentially eligible for CalFresh benefits, or efforts underway to enact such an agreement.

(2) The data and information reported under this subdivision shall be disaggregated by each basic needs service and resource, where applicable.

(3) Campuses are encouraged to collaborate with the State Department of Social Services to obtain the data identified in paragraph (1), as applicable.

(d) (1) The office of the Chancellor of the California State
 University shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, develop and submit to the Governor and the Legislature, on or before March 1 of each year from 2026 to 2030, inclusive, a report based on the data and information reported by campuses pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) and information on the use of funds made available from the Budget Act of 2022 to implement this section.

(2) A legislative report that includes the information required to be reported in this subdivision and submitted in any of the years 2026 to 2030, inclusive, shall fulfill the reporting requirement pursuant to this subdivision to reduce duplicative efforts.

(e) This section does not preclude the California State University and the
 University of California from having additional basic needs staff who assist the Basic Needs Coordinator in completing the requirements of subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 600, Sec. 1.   (SB 271)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66023.5.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Basic needs services and resources” includes, but is not limited to, housing, food, clothing, feminine hygiene, diapers, technology, childcare services and resources, and mental health services and resources.

(2) “Childcare services and resources” includes, but is not limited to, providing information on affordable childcare options on and near campus and information and
 connections to local resource and referral agencies in order to obtain support in applying to state and federal childcare subsidies and programs and finding local childcare providers, including, but not limited to, the California state preschool program, Head Start, the California Work Opportunity and Responsibility to Kids (CalWORKs) childcare program, and general child care and development programs. Childcare services and resources may also include direct financial support or service support.

(3) “Coordinator” means a basic needs coordinator established pursuant to this section.

(b) Each campus of the California Community Colleges shall do all of the following:

(1) No later than July 1, 2022, establish the position of the Basic Needs Coordinator, and designate a staff person as the Basic Needs Coordinator to serve as the single point of contact for students experiencing basic needs insecurity related to basic needs services and resources. The coordinator shall act as a broker in identifying, supporting, and linking students to on- and off-campus housing, food, mental health, and other basic needs services and resources. To ensure the effectiveness and impact of this position, the coordinator shall be a dedicated position solely focused on addressing the basic needs of students and meet qualifications such as experience providing services to high-need and diverse populations. The coordinator shall oversee and coordinate with other staff tasked with addressing students’ basic needs, shall inform students of
 on- and off-campus basic needs services and resources and how to access them, and shall develop on- and off-campus partnerships to provide basic needs services and resources to their students.

(2) (A) No later than July 1, 2022, establish a Basic Needs Center, which means a central location on campus where basic needs services, resources, and staff are made available to students. The Basic Needs Center is intended to be a one-stop, single location and point of contact for students to more easily access and gain awareness of basic needs services and resources. The campus shall make a reasonable effort to locate all on-campus basic needs services and resources at the Basic Needs Center. If the campus cannot reasonably locate all basic needs services or resources at the Basic Needs Center, the campus shall provide students with the location and contact information, including name, telephone number, and email address, for all
 basic needs services and resources not located in the Basic Needs Center. The coordinator shall be housed in the Basic Needs Center.

(B) Each Basic Needs Center shall help ensure that students have the information they need to enroll in CalFresh, the California Earned Income Tax Credit (CalEITC), the Young Child Tax Credit (YCTC), the California Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC), and other relevant government benefits programs.